District of Columbia statutes.
10-1273

Repealed

Findings.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 401, 41 DCR 5333
2001 Ed., § 10-1213.
1981 Ed., § 9-601.
Repeal of Washington Convention Center Management Act: Section 401 of D.C. Law 10-188 provided that all sections of the Washington Convention Center Management Act of 1979, effective November 3, 1979, except for §§ 3 and 4, which are codified as §§ 10-1211 and 10-1212, are repealed.